apertium-quc.quc.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Sustantivo; Noun
%<adj%>              ! Adjetivo; Adjective
%<prn%>              ! Pronombre; Pronoun
%<adv%>              ! Adverbio; Adverb
%<pr%>               ! Preposición; Preposition
%<num%>              ! Numerales; Numeral
%<aux%>              ! Auxiliar; Auxiliary
%<prn%>              ! Pronombre; Pronoun
%<clf%>              ! Clasificador; Classifier
%<barb%>             ! Barbarismo; Barbarism
%<qst%>              ! Question marker
%<dem%>              ! Demonstrative
%<det%>              ! Determiners
%<cnjcoo%>           ! Coordinating conjunction
%<np%>               ! Nombre Propio
%<top%>              ! Topónimo
%<ant%>              ! Anthroponym
%<m%>                ! Masculino
%<f%>                ! Femenino
%<part%>             ! Particle
%<mod%>              ! Modal
%<foc%>              ! Focus
%<v%>                ! Verbo
%<cnjsub%>           ! Conjunción subordinada
%<ij%>               ! Interyección
%<sym%>              ! 

%<attr%>             ! Atributivo

%<pro%>              ! Proclítico

%<iv%>               ! Intransitivo
%<tv%>               ! Transitivo

%<perf%>             ! Perfectivo (completivo)
%<impf%>             ! Imperfectivo
%<fut%>              ! Futuro
%<imp%>              ! Imperativo

%<p1%>               ! Primera persona
%<p2%>               ! Segunda persona
%<p3%>               ! Tercera persona
%<frm%>              ! Formal

%<pp%>               ! Participio perfectivo

%<sg%>               ! Singular
%<pl%>               ! Plural;

%<abl%>              ! Ablativo
%<lat%>              ! Lativo

%<pers%>             ! Personal
%<al%>               ! Otros
%<cog%>              ! Cognomen
%<dir%>              ! Direccional
%<itg%>              ! Interrogativo
%<neg%>              ! Negativo
%<ord%>              ! Ordinal
%<rel%>              ! Relacional, relativo

%<ints%>             ! Intensificador
%<emph%>             ! Emfático

%<agfoc%>            ! Antipasivo II
%<anti%>             ! Antipasivo
%<fin%>              ! Final de frase
%<inf%>              ! Infinitivo
%<mov%>              ! Movimiento
%<pass%>             ! Pasivo
%<stat%>             ! Pasivo estativo


%<o_sg1%>            !
%<o_sg2%>            !
%<o_sg3%>            !
%<o_pl1%>            !
%<o_pl2%>            !
%<o_pl3%>            !

%<s_sg1%>            !
%<s_sg2%>            !
%<s_sg3%>            !
%<s_pl1%>            !
%<s_pl2%>            !
%<s_pl3%>            !

%<px1sg%>            ! First person singular possessive
%<px2sg%>            ! Second person singular possessive
%<px3sg%>            ! First person singular possessive
%<px1pl%>            ! First person singular possessive
%<px2pl%>            ! First person singular possessive
%<px3pl%>            ! First person singular possessive

%<cm%>               ! Coma
%<guio%>             ! Guión
%<lpar%>             !
%<lquest%>           !
%<lquot%>            !
%<rpar%>             !
%<rquot%>            !
%<percent%>          ! Porcentaje
%<sent%>             !

@D.AGR.B@            !
@P.AGR.A@            !
@P.AGR.B@            !
@P.Pref.ON@          !
@R.Pref.ON@          !
@D.Poss@             !
@P.Poss.None@        !
@R.Poss.None@        !
@D.SS@               !
@P.SS.Dep@           !
@R.SS@               !
@U.SS.Dep@           !
@U.SS.Ind@           !
@U.VAL.1@            !
@U.VAL.2@            !


%{n%}                ! n / 0
%{w%}                ! w / 0
%{r%}                ! r / 0
%{a%}                ! a / 0
%{i%}                ! i / 0
%{o%}                ! o / u
%{ʼ%}                ! ʼ / 0
%{U%}                ! o / u / a
%{O%}                ! o / u
%{V%}                         !

%>                   ! Morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Miscellaneous ;
Direccionales ;
@P.Poss.None@ Nouns ;
Determiners ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Prepositions ;
Numerals ;
Pronouns ;
Punctuation ;
Barbarisms ;
Abreviaciones ;
Símbolos ;
Conjunctions ;
Propios ;
Digits ;

Procliticos ;
Poss ;
TAM1 ;

Irregulares ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON OQ

%+oq%<aux%>:%>oq     # ;
                      # ;

LEXICON IK

%+ik%<aux%>:%>%{i%}k # ;
                      # ;

LEXICON Procliticos

in%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%+:in%> Subst ;
at%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%+:at%> Subst ;
lal%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%+:lal%> Subst ;
areʼ%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%+:areʼ%> Subst ;
! fixme%+: comprueba las reglas para -oj/-uj
oj%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%+:oj%> Subst ;
uj%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%+:uj%> Subst ;
ix%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%+:ix%> Subst ;
e%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%+:e%{ʼ%}%> Subst ;

e%<pl%>%+:e%{ʼ%}%> Subst ;

LEXICON Subst

Poss ;
Adjectives ; ! etyoxlaj
Cardinals ; ! ewuqubʼ


LEXICON Poss
@P.Poss.None@         Nouns ;

%<px1sg%>:%{n%}u%>    Sust ; ! nu w
%<px2sg%>:a%{w%}%>    Sust ; ! a aw
%<px3sg%>:%{r%}%>     Sust ;  ! u r
!%<px3sg%>%<frm%>:     Sust ;  ! ø
%<px1pl%>:q%{a%}%>    Sust ; ! qa q
%<px2pl%>:i%{w%}%>    Sust ; ! i iw

! TODO: Find out better rules for this
! kbʼe/<px3pl>bʼe<n>
%<px3pl%>:k%{i%}%>    Sust ; ! ki k
%<px3pl%>:k%>         Sust ; ! ki k ! Use/Sub ! Src/Biblia
%<px3pl%>:kʼ%>        Sust ; ! ki k ! Use/Sub ! Src/Cuentos

! enuchikop -> e+nuchikop

LEXICON Sust
                      Nouns ;
                      Relationals ;
                      Propios ;

!LEXICON Verbs
!                      IVʼ ;
!                      TVʼ ;

LEXICON N-ixoq    ! -ibʼ

%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ibʼ     # ;
%<n%>:                # ;

LEXICON N-iyom   ! -abʼ

%<n%>%<pl%>:%>abʼ # ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-alit   ! -omʼ

%<n%>%<pl%>:%>omʼ # ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-nan

@R.Poss.None@%<n%>:@R.Poss.None@%>axel # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>:@D.Poss@ # ;

LEXICON N-chiʼ
! chiʼaj     mouth
! nuchiʼ  my mouth
@R.Poss.None@%<n%>:@R.Poss.None@%>aj # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>:@D.Poss@ # ;

LEXICON N-ixoqilom

@R.Poss.None@%<n%>:@R.Poss.None@%>om # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>:@D.Poss@ # ;


LEXICON N-cholaj

@R.Poss.None@%<n%>:@R.Poss.None@%>il # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>:@D.Poss@ # ;

LEXICON N-rajawaxik

@R.Poss.None@%<n%>:@R.Poss.None@ # ;



LEXICON N-chak

%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-imul

%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-tinamit

%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-uxlabʼal

%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-ajjudiʼo

%<n%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;

LEXICON N-pantalon

%<n%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>es # ;

LEXICON N-chuch

%<n%>%<pl%>:%>uʼibʼ     # ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-bʼe

%<n%>: # ;

!LEXICON N-chiʼ

!%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N-patología

%<n%>%<barb%>: # ;
%<n%>%<barb%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;

LEXICON N-estado

%<n%>%<barb%>: # ;
%<n%>%<barb%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;

LEXICON N-reacción

%<n%>%<barb%>:ón # ;
%<n%>%<barb%>%<pl%>:on%>es # ;

LEXICON N-virus

%<n%>%<barb%>: # ;

LEXICON A-saq

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<attr%>:%>a # ;
%<adj%>%<ints%>:%>alaj # ;

LEXICON A-jeʼl
! <ik>

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<attr%>:%>ik # ;
%<adj%>%<ints%>:%>ikalaq # ;

LEXICON A-nim

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<attr%>:%>a # ;
%<adj%>%<attr%>%<pl%>:%>aq # ;
%<adj%>%<pl%>:%>aʼq # ;

LEXICON A-chʼutin

%<adj%>:%>n # ;
%<adj%>%<attr%>:%>na # ;
%<adj%>%<attr%>%<pl%>:%>q # ;
%<adj%>%<pl%>:%>ʼq # ;

LEXICON A-antiviral

%<adj%>%<barb%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<barb%>%<pl%>:%>es # ;

LEXICON Ad-aninaq

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON Ad-jampaʼ

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON Pr

%<pr%>: # ;

LEXICON Rel

%<n%>%<rel%>: # ;

LEXICON Prepositions
jachaʼ:jachaʼ Pr ;                 ! "like, as"
pachaʼ:pachaʼ Pr ;                 ! "like, as"
kʼa:kʼa Pr ;                       ! "hasta"
kʼateʼ:kʼate Pr ;                  ! "hasta"  ! Src/Cuentos
LEXICON Nouns
tataʼ:tataʼ N-ixoq ;               ! "a gentleman"
ajaw:ajaw N-ixoq ;                 ! "; owner"
tzij:tzij N-alit ;                 ! "palabra, cuento; word, story"
saqalajtzij:saqalajtzij N-alit ;   ! "verdad; truth" ! Src/Biblia
qʼatojtzij:qʼatojzij N-alit ;     ! "; " ! Src/Biblia ! Use/Spell
qʼataltzij:qʼataltzij N-alit ;     ! "; " ! Src/Biblia
qʼatbʼaltzij:qʼatbʼaltzij N-alit ; ! "gobernador; alcalde; law, courthouse, judge, government, verdict" ! Use/Spell
winaq:winaq N-ixoq ;               ! "persona; person, people"
chak:chak N-chak ;                 ! "trabajo; work"
imul:imul N-imul ;                 ! "conejo; rabbit"
chʼajomanel:chʼajomanel N-iyom ;   ! "lavandero; laundryman"
loqʼomanel:loqʼomanel N-iyom ;     ! "comprador; buyer"
achi:achi N-iyom ;                 ! "man"
chaqʼ¹:chaqʼ N-nan ;                ! "hermano menor"
chuch:chuch N-chuch ;              ! "mother"
ajkʼay:ajkʼay N-ixoq ; ! "seller"
al:al N-nan ; ! "child (boy or girl) of a female"
atinibʼal:atinibal N-tinamit ; ! "bathing place"
choʼm:choʼm N-tinamit ; ! "shrimp"
kutaʼmil:kutaʼmil N-tinamit ; ! "tree trunk"
repoʼy:repoʼy N-tinamit ; ! "cabbage"
witzikʼ:witzikʼ N-tinamit ; ! "flor de milpa (corn flower)"
bʼe:bʼe N-bʼe ; ! "camino; road"
ij:ij N-chiʼ ; ! "back"
kʼuʼx²:kʼux N-chiʼ ; ! "soul" ! Src/Cuentos
qul:qul N-chiʼ ; ! "throat"
ukʼaʼ:ukʼaʼ N-chiʼ ; ! "horn, testicle"
xaq:xaq N-chiʼ ; ! "leaf"
kʼojolabʼalaxel:kʼojolabal N-nan ; ! "son-in-law"
kʼojolaxel:kʼajol N-nan ; ! "son of male"
chʼaqapil:chʼaqap N-cholaj ; ! "piece"
ijaʼlil:ijaʼl N-cholaj ; ! "generation"
kʼisbʼalil:kʼisbal N-cholaj ; ! "end"
tuqaril:tuqar N-cholaj ; ! "debility"
xeteʼyil:xeteʼy N-cholaj ; ! "tribe"
ixoqilom:ixoqil N-ixoqilom ; ! "mujer; wife"
uxlabʼal:uxlabʼal N-uxlabʼal ; ! "espíritu; spirit"
kajbʼal:kajbʼal N-uxlabʼal ; ! "hoja; leaf"
kʼutbʼal:kʼutbʼal N-uxlabʼal ; ! "signo; sign"
etabʼal:etabʼal N-uxlabʼal ; ! "medida; measure"
chʼuʼj:chʼuʼj N-iyom ; ! "loco"
xibʼal:xbʼal N-nan ; ! "brother of a female" ! Src/UTexas
pantalon:pantalon N-pantalon ; ! ""
dyos²:dyos N-pantalon ; ! ""
griʼego:griʼego N-ajjudiʼo ; ! ""
ajdekapolis:ajdekapolis N-ajjudiʼo ; ! ""
ajlaʼodiseʼa:ajlaʼodiseʼa N-ajjudiʼo ; ! ""
ajgalileʼa:ajgalileʼa N-ajjudiʼo ; ! ""
ajromano:ajromano  N-ajjudiʼo ; ! ""
ajjudey:ajjudey N-ixoq ;
choqʼbʼal:choqʼbʼal N-iyom ; ! "aguijón; sting"
rajawaxik:rajawaxik N-rajawaxik ;        ! "importante; important, necessary"
rajawaxik:rajawixik N-rajawaxik ;        ! "important" ! Src/xelaorganica
rajawaxik:rajawxik N-rajawaxik ;        ! "important" ! Src/Wiki
rajawaxik:rajwaxik N-rajawaxik ;        ! "important" ! Src/ALMG
LEXICON Adjectives
chun:chun A-saq ; ! "bitter (apple)"
jeʼl:jeʼl A-jeʼl ; ! "bonito, precioso"
kojom:kojom A-saq ; ! "nominated"
pochʼpobʼinaq:pochʼpobinaq A-saq ; ! "shelled (beans)"
taqoʼm:taqoʼm A-saq ; ! "carta;letter"
nim:nim A-nim ;              ! "large (plural)"
chom:chom A-nim ;              ! ""
nitzʼ:nitzʼ A-nim ; ! "small [Totonicapán]"
pim:pim A-nim ; ! "thick (something flat like board)"
chʼutin:chʼuti A-chʼutin ;              ! ""
yaʼtal:yaʼtal A-jeʼl ; ! "lícito"
LEXICON Adverbs
jampaʼ:jampaʼ Ad-jampaʼ ;          ! "cuándo; when"
jawi:jawiʼ Ad-jampaʼ ; ! "¿dónde?"
jawichiʼ:jawchiʼ Ad-jampaʼ ; ! "¿dónde?"  ! Src/Dico
jawijeʼ:jawijeʼ Ad-jampaʼ ; ! "¿dónde?"
chanim:chanim Ad-aninaq ;          ! "right now, rapidly"
jelaʼ:jelaʼ  Ad-aninaq ; ! "over there; like that"
na:na  Ad-aninaq ; ! "marker of future; or certainty"
xaqbʼi:xaqbi  Ad-aninaq ; ! "very quickly; very soon"
LEXICON Barbarisms
alergia:alergia N-estado ; ! ""
estado:estado N-estado ; ! ""
mastocito:mastocito N-estado ; ! ""
autopsia:autopsia N-estado ; ! ""
histamina:histamina N-estado ; ! ""
vela:vela N-estado ;
reacción:reacci N-reacción ; ! ""
donación:donaci N-reacción ; ! ""
punción:punci N-reacción ; ! ""
inyección:inyecci N-reacción ; ! ""
hipoperfusión:hipoperfusi N-reacción ; ! ""
adenovirus:adenovirus N-virus ; ! ""
picornavirus:picornavirus N-virus ; ! ""
enterovirus:enterovirus N-virus ; ! ""
metanol:metanol N-virus ; ! ""
pericerebral:pericerebral A-antiviral ;
hormonal:hormonal A-antiviral ;
gastrointestinal:gastrointestinal A-antiviral ;
antibacterial:antibacterial A-antiviral ;
fisiología:fisiología N-patología ;
fisiopatología:fisiopatología N-patología ;
patofisiología:patofisiología N-patología ;
patología:patología N-patología ;
pimienta:pimienta N-patología ;
